Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1111
Inhalation analgesia, defined.

Inhalation analgesia means the administration of nitrous oxide and oxygen to diminish or eliminate pain in a conscious patient.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 444.